Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2094.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 618(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:Section 618. Revenue Estimates.--(a) (1) The Department of 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Revenue in conjunction with the Secretary of the Budget shall make revenue estimates for the use of the Governor in preparing the budget with periodic revisions until the final estimate is signed by the Governor not later than the time [he signs] the general appropriation bill becomes law. The revenue estimates used [to sign] in conjunction with any appropriation bill shall show separately State revenues, Federal funds, and, if specifically appropriated, funds from other sources. [The](2) If the Governor signs an appropriation bill, the Governor shall item veto any part [of any appropriation bill] that causes total appropriations to exceed the official revenue estimate plus any unappropriated surplus.(3) If the general appropriation bill becomes law without the approval of the Governor and the amount appropriated in the general appropriation bill and other appropriation bills exceeds the official revenue estimate plus any unappropriated surplus, the following shall apply:(i) The Secretary of the Budget shall, no later than the time that the general appropriation bill becomes law, disapprove or reduce amounts under section 615 from the departments, boards and commissions to which section 615 applies which cause the total appropriations to exceed the official revenue estimate plus any unappropriated surplus.(ii) Except as provided under subclause (iii), at no time during a fiscal year when this clause applies may the total amount disapproved or reduced under this clause be less than the total amount disapproved or reduced under this clause at the time the general appropriation bill becomes law.(iii) During a fiscal year in which this subclause applies, if a change in a statute affecting revenues and receipts is 20250HB2094PN2690 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enacted that results in a change in a revenue estimate, the amounts disapproved or reduced under this clause may be revised to account for the additional revenue.(4) No changes in the [revenue estimates] official revenue estimate shall be made thereafter unless changes in statutes affecting revenues and receipts are enacted.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to general appropriation acts enacted after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2094PN2690 - 3 - 12345678910